Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2235
Sheriff; process; return; contents.

It shall be the duty of every sheriff, on the receipt of any writ or other legal process, except subpoenas, to note thereon the time of receiving the same. The sheriff shall also state in his or her return on the same the time and manner of executing it.

Laws 1929, c. 82, art. XV, § 174, p. 324;

C.S.1929, § 22-1504;

R.S.1943, § 26-1,175;

R.S.1943, (1979), § 26-1,175;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-598;

Laws 1992, LB 1059, § 19.